Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5452.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-72-5.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-72 entitled "Department
of Children, Youth and Families" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-72-5.2. Development of a continuum of children’s behavioral health programs.
(a) The departments of children, youth and families (DCYF) and human services (DHS)
shall cooperate to develop a design of a continuum of care for children’s behavioral health services
that encourages the use of alternative psychiatric and other services to hospitalization and reviews
the utilization of each service in order to better match services and programs to the needs of the
children and families as well as continuously improve the quality of and access to services. The
departments of children, youth and families and human services shall present a report to the
governor and the general assembly no later than February 1, 2006 that fully describes this
continuum of services and outlines a detailed plan for its implementation, including resource
requirements, responsibilities, milestones, and time frames, as well as a set of indicators and
program metrics that will be employed to evaluate its clinical and fiscal effectiveness over time.
The report shall also describe any and all changes proposed in program oversight or budgetary
responsibility for specific services. An important step towards the development of such continuum
of care is to assure the appropriate management of psychiatric hospitalizations. To that end the state
shall:
(1) Amend contractual agreements with RIte Care health plans to reflect complete

responsibility for the management of psychiatric hospitalizations, specifically the development of
hospital diversion and post discharge services; and the utilization of crisis intervention services as
a requirement for authorization of a psychiatric admission for all children enrolled in RIte Care;
and
(2) Issue a request for proposals to identify a contracted entity to reflect complete
responsibility for the management of psychiatric hospitalizations, specifically the development of
hospital diversion and post discharge services for crisis intervention services as a requirement for
authorization of a psychiatric admission for all Medicaid-eligible children not enrolled in RIte Care.
The request for proposals shall include a dispute resolution process.
(b) It shall be the public policy of the state that the department of children, youth and
families be the chief state agency responsible for all matters related to children's behavioral health
including, but not limited to, contracting with whatever agencies are necessary to provide and
implement these services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001123
========
LC001123 - Page 2 of 3